District of Columbia statutes.
4-1303.03b

Single reporting line.

(a)

The Agency shall establish a single reporting line to receive reports of suspected child abuse and neglect.

(b)

The single reporting line shall be maintained by the Agency, with the assistance and support of the Metropolitan Police Department, and shall be staffed 24 hours a day, 7 days a week.

(c)

Upon receiving reports on the single reporting line, the Agency shall:

(1)

Review and screen the reports to collect relevant information from the source of the report; and

(2)

Transmit the reports to the entity with responsibility under the laws of the District of Columbia, or the appropriate governmental entity in another jurisdiction, for investigation or provision of services.

(d)

The Agency shall provide quarterly summaries to the Mayor and Council regarding the number and types of reports made to the single reporting line.

(e)

The Mayor, with the assistance and support of the Agency and the Metropolitan Police Department and in accordance with of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules for operating the single reporting line. The rules shall include:

(1)

The mechanics and logistics of the single reporting line, including location, staffing, and equipment;

(2)

The process for receiving calls, including forms and methods for the recording of information;

(3)

The process for the immediate transmittal of calls to the governmental entity responsible for investigation or provision of services;

(4)

Procedures for preserving the confidentiality of information and the retention of records; and

(5)

Training requirements for persons staffing the single reporting line.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title III, § 303b
as added Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-341, § 2(k), 52 DCR 2315